West Virginia, session 2026, HB4232.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. State Emergency Response Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-5A-5 of this code, modified by the State Emergency Response Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 13, 2025, relating to the State Emergency Response Commission (emergency planning and community right-to-know, 55 CSR 01), is authorized.